Utah statutes.
63I-1-105.   Reviewing committee -- Report of recommendations.

The reviewing committee shall submit a report of its recommendations, including proposed legislation and recommendations concerning the statute or agency, to the Legislature before January 1 of the year in which the agency is scheduled for termination.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

